North Carolina, session 2025, SB658.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Preservation Greensboro Incorporated
for operating expenses and restoration of the Blandwood Mansion, the 19th century residence of
Governor John Motley Morehead.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S658-v-1*